Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.82.110

County antiprofiteering revolving funds.

(1) In an action brought by the attorney general on behalf of the state under RCW 9A.82.100(1)(b)(i) in which the state prevails, any payments ordered in excess of the actual damages sustained shall be deposited in the crime victims' compensation account provided in RCW 7.68.045.

(2)(a) The county legislative authority may establish an antiprofiteering revolving fund to be administered by the county prosecuting attorney under the conditions and for the purposes provided by this subsection. Disbursements from the fund shall be on authorization of the county prosecuting attorney. No appropriation is required for disbursements.

(b) Any prosecution and investigation costs, including attorney's fees, recovered for the state by the county prosecuting attorney as a result of enforcement of civil and criminal statutes pertaining to any offense included in the definition of criminal profiteering, whether by final judgment, settlement, or otherwise, shall be deposited, as directed by a court of competent jurisdiction, in the fund established by this subsection. In an action brought by a prosecuting attorney on behalf of the county under RCW 9A.82.100(1)(b)(i) in which the county prevails, any payments ordered in excess of the actual damages sustained shall be deposited in the crime victims' compensation account provided in RCW 7.68.045.

(c) The county legislative authority may prescribe a maximum level of moneys in the antiprofiteering revolving fund. Moneys exceeding the prescribed maximum shall be transferred to the county current expense fund.

(d) The moneys in the fund shall be used by the county prosecuting attorney for the investigation and prosecution of any offense, within the jurisdiction of the county prosecuting attorney, included in the definition of criminal profiteering, including civil enforcement.

(e) If a county has not established an antiprofiteering revolving fund, any payments or forfeitures ordered to the county under this chapter shall be deposited to the county current expense fund.

[ 2010 c 122 s 4; 2009 c 479 s 11; 2001 c 222 s 15. Prior: 1985 c 455 s 12; 1984 c 270 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 479: See note following RCW 2.56.030.

Purpose—Effective date—2001 c 222: See notes following RCW 9A.82.001.